Illinois, session 104th, SB724.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Navigator Certification Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 121/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Navigator Certification Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-524, eff. 8-23-13.)